Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,109
Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund; uses.

The Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund shall be used to provide financial support for research and other service functions performed by the diagnostic laboratory of the University of Nebraska Animal Health Research Center.

Laws 1976, LB 869, § 4.